Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2279.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5552(b)(1) of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 5552. Other offenses.* * *(b) Major offenses.--A prosecution for any of the following offenses must be commenced within five years after it is committed:(1) Under the following provisions of Title 18 (relating to crimes and offenses):Section 901 (relating to criminal attempt) involving attempt to commit murder where no murder occurs.Section 902 (relating to criminal solicitation) involving solicitation to commit murder where no murder 12345678910111213141516171819 occurs.Section 903 (relating to criminal conspiracy) involving conspiracy to commit murder where no murder occurs.Section 911 (relating to corrupt organizations).Section 2506 (relating to drug delivery resulting in death).Section 2702 (relating to aggravated assault).Section 2706 (relating to terroristic threats).Section 2713 (relating to neglect of care-dependent person).Section 2901 (relating to kidnapping).Section 3301 (relating to arson and related offenses).Section 3502 (relating to burglary).Section 3701 (relating to robbery).Section 3921 (relating to theft by unlawful taking or disposition) through section 3933 (relating to unlawful use of computer).Section 4101 (relating to forgery).Section 4107 (relating to deceptive or fraudulent business practices).Section 4108 (relating to commercial bribery and breach of duty to act disinterestedly).Section 4109 (relating to rigging publicly exhibited contest).Section 4117 (relating to insurance fraud).Section 4701 (relating to bribery in official and political matters) through section 4703 (relating to retaliation for past official action).20260HB2279PN2981 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 4902 (relating to perjury) through section 4912 (relating to impersonating a public servant).Section 4952 (relating to intimidation of witnesses or victims).Section 4953 (relating to retaliation against witness, victim or party).Section 5101 (relating to obstructing administration of law or other governmental function).Section 5111 (relating to dealing in proceeds of unlawful activities).Section 5512 (relating to lotteries, etc.) through section 5514 (relating to pool selling and bookmaking).Section 5902(b) (relating to prostitution and related offenses).Section 6111(g)(2) and (4) (relating to sale or transfer of firearms).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2279PN2981 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718